Utah statutes.
17-28-8.   Eligible appointees to fire department.

The fire chief of each fire department of counties subject to the provisions of this chapter shall, subject to the rules of the County Fire Civil Service Council, appoint from the certified county fire civil service register, all persons necessary to fill all firefighter civil service positions in the county fire department.



Amended by Chapter 115, 1992 General Session

